Georgia statutes. TITLE 29 Guardian and Ward
Article 4 Protection of Property Interests

29-5-30.
Inventory and plan for handling ward’s property.

Within two months of appointment, the conservator shall file with the court and provide to the ward’s guardian, if any, an inventory of the ward’s property and a plan for managing, expending, and distributing the property.

The inventory shall describe all the assets and liabilities of the ward and shall include a list of all the personal and real property owned by the ward and describe how the property is titled. When the inventory is returned to the court, the conservator shall swear or affirm, in addition to the usual oath on making returns, that the inventory contains a true statement of all the assets and liabilities of the ward known to the conservator.

The plan for managing, expending, and distributing the ward’s property must be based on the actual needs of the ward and take into consideration the best interest of the ward. The conservator shall include in the plan an estimate of the duration of the conservatorship, projections for expenses and resources, and any proposals to change the title of any of the assets in the conservatorship estate. The plan and any proposed budget for the expenditure of funds in excess of the anticipated income from the property must be approved by the court. With each annual return filed thereafter, the conservator shall file with the court and provide to the guardian, if any, an updated plan pursuant to the provisions of this subsection.

History.

Code 1981, §

29-5-30

, enacted by Ga. L. 2004, p. 161, § 1.

Cross references.

Administrator’s duty to file inventory, § 53-7-75 (Pre-1998 Probate Code).

29-5-31.
Retention of property; exchange or conversion of stocks or securities.

A conservator may retain the property received by the conservator on the creation of the conservatorship, including, in the case of a corporate fiduciary, stock or other securities of its own issue, even though the property may not otherwise be a legal investment and shall not be liable for the retention, except for gross neglect. In the case of corporate securities, the conservator may likewise retain any securities into which the securities originally received may be converted or which may be derived therefrom as a result of merger, consolidation, stock dividends, splits, liquidations, and similar procedures; and the conservator may exercise by purchase or otherwise any rights, warrants, or conversion features attaching to any such securities.

In the case of a corporate fiduciary, the authority granted in subsection (a) of this Code section shall apply to the exchange or conversion of stock or securities of the corporate fiduciary’s own issue, whether or not any new stock or securities received in exchange therefor are substantially equivalent to those originally held; and such authority shall also apply to the continued retention of all new stock and securities resulting from merger, consolidation, stock dividends, splits, liquidations, and similar procedures and received by virtue of such conversion or exchange of stock or securities of the corporate fiduciary’s own issue, whether or not the new stock or securities are substantially equivalent to those originally received by the fiduciary. The foregoing authority shall have reference, inter alia, to the exchange of such stock or securities for stock or securities of any holding company which owns stock or other interests in one or more other corporations including the corporate fiduciary, whether the holding company is newly formed or already existing, and whether or not any of the corporations own assets identical or similar to the assets of or carry on business identical or similar to the corporation whose stock or securities were previously received by the fiduciary and the continued retention of stock or securities, or both, of the holding company; and such authority shall apply regardless of whether any of the corporations have officers, directors, employees, agents, or trustees in common with the corporation whose stock or securities were previously received by the fiduciary.

History.

Code 1981, §

29-5-31

, enacted by Ga. L. 2004, p. 161, § 1.

29-5-32.
Investment of estate funds by conservator.

A conservator is authorized to invest estate funds in the following and shall not otherwise be liable for such investment, except in the case of gross neglect:

Bonds issued by any county or municipality of this state which have been validated as required by law for the validation of county and municipal bonds;

Bonds issued by any county board of education under Subpart 1 of Part 3 of Article 9 of Chapter 2 of Title 20 for the purpose of building and equipping schoolhouses, which bonds have been validated and confirmed as required under Part 1 of Article 2 of Chapter 82 of Title 36;

Bonds and other securities issued by this state or by the Board of Regents of the University System of Georgia;

Bonds or other obligations issued by the United States government and bonds of any corporation created by an act of Congress, the bonds of which are guaranteed by the United States government;

Interest-bearing deposits in any financial institution located in this state, to the extent the deposits are insured by the Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation, the National Credit Union Share Insurance Fund, or comparable insurance;

Bonds or other obligations issued by a housing authority pursuant to Article 1 of Chapter 3 of Title 8 or issued by any public housing authority or agency of the United States when such bonds or other obligations are secured by a pledge of annual contributions to be paid by the United States government or any agency thereof, as authorized by Code Section 8-3-81;

Bonds or other obligations issued by a housing authority in connection with a redevelopment program pursuant to Chapter 4 of Title 8, as authorized by Code Section 8-4-11;

Bonds issued by the Georgia Education Authority, pursuant to Part 3 of Article 11 of Chapter 2 of Title 20, as authorized by Code Section 20-2-570;

Reserved;

Bonds issued by the Georgia Highway Authority, pursuant to Code Section 32-10-30, as authorized by Code Section 32-10-45;

Bonds or other obligations issued by a municipality or county pursuant to Chapter 61 of Title 36 or by any urban redevelopment agency or housing authority vested with urban redevelopment project powers under Code Section 36-61-17, provided that such bonds or other obligations are secured by an agreement between the issuer and the federal government in accordance with Code Section 36-61-13, as authorized by Code Section 36-61-13;

Reserved;

Farm loan bonds issued by federal land banks or joint-stock land banks under the Federal Farm Loan Act, 12 U.S.C. Sections 2001, et seq., and any notes, bonds, debentures, or other similar obligations, consolidated or otherwise, issued by farm credit institutions pursuant to the Farm Credit Act of 1971, 12 U.S.C. Sections 2001, et seq.;

Real property loans:

Which are not in default;

Which are secured by mortgages or deeds to secure debt conveying a first security title to improve real property;

Which are insured pursuant to the National Housing Act, 12 U.S.C. Sections 1701, et seq.; and

With respect to which loans, on or after default, pursuant to such insurance, debentures in at least the full amount of unpaid principal are issuable, which debentures are fully and unconditionally guaranteed both as to principal and interest by the United States; and

Any other investments which are designated under the laws of this state as lawful or legal investments for guardians or conservators.

History.

Code 1981, §

29-5-32

, enacted by Ga. L. 2004, p. 161, § 1; Ga. L. 2010, p. 579, § 15/SB 131; Ga. L. 2013, p. 141, § 29/HB 79; Ga. L. 2014, p. 866, § 29/SB 340.

Law reviews.

For note discussing and comparing the prudent man rule and the legal list rule in trustee investment, see 15 Mercer L. Rev. 530 (1964).

For article, “The Scope of Permissible Investments by Fiduciaries Under Georgia Law,” see 19 Ga. St. B.J. 6 (1982).

29-5-33.
Holding of investments; corporate fiduciaries.

Whenever by law or by court order the conservator is authorized, permitted, required, or directed to invest funds in direct and general obligations of the United States government, obligations unconditionally guaranteed by the United States government, or obligations of the agencies of the United States government enumerated in Code Section 29-5-32, the conservator may invest in and hold such obligations either directly or in the form of securities or other interests in any open-end or closed-end management type investment company or investment trust registered under the Investment Company Act of 1940, 15 U.S.C. Sections 80a-1, et seq., so long as:

The portfolio of such investment company or investment trust is limited to such obligations and repurchase agreements fully collateralized by such obligations;

Such investment company or investment trust takes delivery of such collateral, either directly or through an authorized custodian; and

Such investment company or investment trust is operated so as to provide a constant net asset value or price per share.

The authority granted in this Code section shall be applicable notwithstanding that a corporate fiduciary or an affiliate of the corporate fiduciary provides services to the investment company or investment trust as investment adviser, custodian, transfer agent, registrar, sponsor, distributor, manager, or otherwise and receives compensation for such services.

History.

Code 1981, §

29-5-33

, enacted by Ga. L. 2004, p. 161, § 1.

29-5-34.
Prudence required from conservator in making investments; acquisition and retention of property.

After receiving court approval as required in subsections (b) and (c) of Code Section 29-5-23, in making investments and in acquiring and retaining those investments and managing property of the ward, the conservator shall exercise the judgment and care, under the circumstances then prevailing, that a prudent person acting in a like capacity and familiar with such matters would use to attain the purposes of the account. In making such investment decisions, a conservator may consider the general economic conditions, the anticipated tax consequences of the investments, the anticipated duration of the account, and the needs of the ward and those entitled to support from the ward.

Within the limitations of the standard provided in subsection (a) of this Code section and with prior approval by the court in accordance with Code Section 29-5-23, a conservator is authorized to acquire and retain every kind of property, including real, personal, or mixed and every kind of investment, specifically including, but not by way of limitation, bonds, debentures and other corporate obligations, and stocks, preferred or common, including the securities of or other interests in any open-end or closed-end management investments company or investment trust registered under the Investment Company Act of 1940, 15 U.S.C. Sections 80a-1, et seq. The propriety of an investment is to be determined by what the conservator knew or should have known at the time of the decision about the inherent nature and expected performance of a particular investment, including probable yield, the attributes of the portfolio, the general economy, and the needs of the ward and those entitled to support from the ward as they existed at the time of the decision. Any determination of liability for investment performance shall consider not only the performance of a particular investment but also the performance of the ward’s portfolio as a whole. Within the limitations of such standard, a conservator may retain property properly acquired, without limitation as to time and without regard to its suitability for original purchase.

A conservator that is a financial institution, trust company, national or state bank, savings bank, or savings and loan association described in Code Section 7-1-242 shall not be precluded from acquiring and retaining securities of or other interests in an investment company or investment trust because the bank or trust company or an affiliate provides services to the investment company or investment trust as investment adviser, custodian, transfer agent, registrar, sponsor, distributor, manager, or otherwise and receives compensation for such services.

History.

Code 1981, §

29-5-34

, enacted by Ga. L. 2004, p. 161, § 1.

29-5-35.
Sale of perishable property; sale of other properties; disposal of other properties; accounting for proceeds; authority of emergency or temporary substitute conservator.

A conservator may sell perishable property of the ward, property of the ward that is liable to deteriorate from keeping, or property of the ward that is expensive to keep, as early as practicable and in such manner as the court shall determine is in the best interest of the ward, after such notice and opportunity for hearing, if any, as the court shall deem practicable under the circumstances.

A conservator may sell stocks or bonds of the ward that are either listed or admitted to unlisted trading privileges upon any stock exchange or quoted regularly in any newspaper having a general circulation in Georgia at a sales price not less than the stock exchange bid price or the published bid price at the time of sale and pay reasonable brokerage commissions not in excess of those customarily charged by stock exchange members.

Except as otherwise provided in subsections (a) and (b) of this Code section, a conservator may petition the court to sell, rent, lease, exchange, or otherwise dispose of property of the ward, whether real or personal or mixed. The petition shall set forth the property involved and the interests therein, the specific purpose of the transaction, the proposed price, the anticipated net proceeds of the sale, all other terms or conditions proposed for the transaction, and that the proposed transaction is in the best interest of the ward.

Upon the filing of the petition, the court shall appoint a guardian ad litem for the ward. The petition and notice shall be served personally on the ward and the guardian ad litem.

If no written objection by a person notified pursuant to subsection (d) of this Code section is filed within 30 days following the mailing of notice or service upon the guardian ad litem, the court shall order such sale summarily in the manner and terms petitioned; provided, however, that if real property is to be converted to personal property, the court shall order the conservator to post additional bond to cover the amount of the anticipated net proceeds of the sale prior to the closing of the sale. If an objection is filed, the court shall hear the matter and grant or deny the petition for sale or make such other order as is in the best interest of the ward, which may require the sale to be private or at public auction, including confirmation of the sale by the court or otherwise.

A conservator shall make a full return to the court within 30 days of every sale, specifying the property sold, the purchasers, and the amounts received, together with the terms of the sale.

The recital in the conservator’s deed of a compliance with legal provisions shall be prima-facie evidence of the facts recited.

Where a conservator sells real property under the provisions of this Code section, liens thereon may be divested and transferred to the proceeds of the sale as a condition of the sale.

An emergency or temporary substitute conservator is authorized to petition the court for leave to sell or otherwise deal with the property of the estate only if good cause is shown for not waiting until a different type of conservatorship is created or the conservatorship is terminated.

History.

Code 1981, §

29-5-35

, enacted by Ga. L. 2004, p. 161, § 1.

Cross references.

Filing of affidavit claiming property to be sold by executors, administrators, and trustees, § 53-8-70 (Pre-1988 Probate Code).

29-5-36.
Development of estate plan for ward; appointment of guardian ad litem prior to implementation of plan.

After notice to interested parties and other persons as the court may direct, and upon a showing that the ward will probably remain in need of a conservator throughout the ward’s lifetime and that it is in the best interest of the ward, the court may order the conservator to apply such principal or income of the ward as is not required for the support, care, education, health, and welfare of the ward and such individuals who are entitled to support from the ward toward the establishment or continuation of an estate plan for the ward and make transfers of the ward’s personal or real property, outright or in trust, provided that the court finds that a competent, reasonable person in the ward’s circumstances would make such transfers and there is no evidence that the ward, if not in need of a conservator, would not adopt such an estate plan.

Prior to authorizing such transfers, the court shall appoint a guardian ad litem for the ward and shall consider:

The composition and value of the entire estate of the ward, other known sources of support available to the ward and individuals who are entitled to be supported by the ward, and the income produced thereby;

The probable expenses for the support, care, education, health, or welfare of the ward and such individuals who are entitled to be supported by the ward for the remainder of the ward’s lifetime in the standard of living to which the ward and the other individuals have become accustomed;

The identity of the proposed transferees and, in particular, whether they are natural objects of the ward’s bounty by relationship or prior behavior of the ward;

The purpose and estate planning benefit to be derived by the transfer as well as the possible harm to any interested party; and

Any previous history or predisposition toward making similar transfers by the ward.

History.

Code 1981, §

29-5-36

, enacted by Ga. L. 2004, p. 161, § 1; Ga. L. 2005, p. 60, § 29/HB 95.

Law reviews.

For annual survey of law of wills, trusts, and administration of estates, see 38 Mercer L. Rev. 417 (1986).

For annual survey on wills, trusts, guardianships, and fiduciary administration, see 69 Mercer L. Rev. 341 (2017).